Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.040

Prohibition on certain contracts.

Agencies that are authorized or directed to establish a board, commission, council, committee, or other similar group made up of volunteers to advise the activities and management of the agency are prohibited from entering into contracts with any or all volunteer members as a means to reimburse or otherwise pay members of such board, commission, council, committee, or other similar group for the work performed as part of the entity, except where payment is specifically authorized by statute.

[ 2012 c 224 s 5.]